Massachusetts, session 194th, S2461.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 58A of Chapter 31 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and inserting in its place thereof 
the following section:- 
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, in any city, 
town or district that accepts this section, no person shall be eligible to have their name certified 
for original appointment to the position of firefighter or police officer if such person has reached 
his thirty-second birthday on the date of the entrance examination. 

of 2 8  Notwithstanding the first sentence, a veteran who has not exceeded the maximum age set 
forth in 10 U.S.C. 505(a) for original enlistment in the Armed Forces of the United States shall 
be exempt from the age restriction imposed by this section.